Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8269.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-93.1 of the General Laws entitled "The Rhode Island Holocaust
and Genocide Education Commission [see Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of
Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-93.1-8. Annual appropriation.
The general assembly shall appropriate, out of money in the treasury not otherwise
appropriated during any given fiscal year, the sum of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) annually to
the commission in furtherance of their education efforts.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005359
========